Hawaii statutes.
[§39A-326] Exemption from taxation of
department property. All revenues derived by the department from any
project or under the project agreement pertaining thereto shall be exempt from
all state and county taxation. Any right, title, and interest of the
department in any project shall also be exempt from all state and county
taxation.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the
interest of the project party or user of the project under the project
agreement or related agreement shall not be exempt from taxation to a greater
extent than it would be if the costs of the project were directly financed by
the project party or other user. [L 2006, c 148, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next